North Carolina, session 2025, SB971.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The Department of Public Instruction shall study and make
recommendations on the feasibility and potential outcomes of a statewide year-round school year,
including analysis of the following:
(1) Educational outcomes.
(2) Summer learning loss.
(3) Testing administration.
(4) Dual enrollment in community college courses for high school students.
(5) Travel and tourism participation and revenues.
(6) Seasonal employment.
(7) Extracurricular learning opportunities and camps.
(8) Scheduling for families and communities.
(9) Implementation considerations.
(10) Building utilization.
(11) Any other area the Department deems relevant to the feasibility and potential
outcomes of a statewide year-round school calendar.
SECTION 2. The Department of Public Instruction shall submit a report on the
results of its study, including any proposed legislation, to the Joint Legislative Education
Oversight Committee no later than February 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year for costs associated with conducting the study and preparing the report
required by this act.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S971-v-1*